deps/stemmers/algorithms/tagalog.sbl
// Tagalog stemmer derived from https://github.com/andrianllmm/tagalog-stemmer

strings ( dup )
integers ( start )
booleans (
    removed_prefix
    removed_infix
    removed_duplication
    removed_suffix
    likely_foreign
)

routines (
    special_cases
    exception1
    scan_foreign
    has_minimum_remainder
    has_replacement_remainder
    has_minimum_infix_remainder
    remove_partial_duplication
    remove_prefix_9
    remove_prefix_8
    remove_prefix_7
    remove_prefix_6
    remove_prefix_5
    remove_prefix_4
    remove_prefix_3
    remove_prefix_2
    remove_prefix_once
    remove_infix
    has_minimum_suffix_stem
    remove_suffix
    normalize_suffix
    normalize_initial
)

externals ( stem )

groupings ( vowel )

stringescapes {}

define vowel 'aeiou'

define special_cases as (
    [substring] atlimit among (
        'araw-araw' (<- 'araw')
        'kanyang' (<- 'kanya')
    )
)

define exception1 as (
    [substring] atlimit among (
        'alipin'
        'alitan'
        'asian'
        'baitang'
        'bakasyon'
        'baybayin'
        'birheng'
        'buhangin'
        'bulwagan'
        'dinamita'
        'dinastiya'
        'kalakal'
        'kamara'
        'kampanya'
        'kapangyarihan'
        'kapilya'
        'kapital'
        'karapatan'
        'karera'
        'kailangan'
    )
)

define scan_foreign as (
    do (
        goto ('c' or 'f' or 'j' or 'q' or 'v' or 'x' or 'z')
        set likely_foreign
    )
)

define has_minimum_remainder as (
    $(limit - cursor >= 3)
    test (gopast vowel gopast vowel)
)

define has_replacement_remainder as (
    $(limit - cursor >= 1)
    test gopast vowel
)

define has_minimum_infix_remainder as (
    $(limit - cursor >= 2)
    test (gopast vowel gopast vowel)
)

define remove_partial_duplication as (
    (
        $(limit >= 5)
        [vowel] -> dup
        test dup
        delete
        set removed_duplication
    ) or (
        $(limit >= 6)
        [hop 2] -> dup
        test dup
        delete
        set removed_duplication
    ) or (
        $(limit >= 9)
        [hop 3] -> dup
        test dup
        delete
        set removed_duplication
    )
)

define remove_prefix_9 as (
    [substring] among (
        'nakikipag' 'pakikipag'
            (has_minimum_remainder delete set removed_prefix)
    )
)

define remove_prefix_8 as (
    [substring] among (
        'pinakama'
            (has_minimum_remainder delete set removed_prefix)

        'panganga'
            (has_replacement_remainder <- 'ka' set removed_prefix)
    )
)

define remove_prefix_7 as (
    [substring] among (
        'makapag' 'nakapag' 'tagapag' 'makipag' 'nakipag'
            (has_minimum_remainder delete set removed_prefix)
        'pagpapa' 'pinagka'
            (has_minimum_remainder delete set removed_prefix)
    )
)

define remove_prefix_6 as (
    [substring] among (
        'pakiki' 'napaka' 'pinaka' 'ipinag'
            (has_minimum_remainder delete set removed_prefix)
    )
)

define remove_prefix_5 as (
    [substring] among (
        'magpa' 'pagka' 'pinag' 'mapag'
            (has_minimum_remainder delete set removed_prefix)
    )
)

define remove_prefix_4 as (
    [substring] among (
        'mapa' 'taga' 'ipag' 'tiga' 'pala' 'pina' 'pang'
            (has_minimum_remainder delete set removed_prefix)
        'naka' 'nang' 'mang' 'sing'
            (has_minimum_remainder delete set removed_prefix)
    )
)

define remove_prefix_3 as (
    [substring] among (
        'ipa' 'pam' 'pan' 'pag' 'tag'
            (has_minimum_remainder delete set removed_prefix)
        'mai' 'mag' 'nam' 'nag' 'man' 'may'
            (has_minimum_remainder delete set removed_prefix)
    )
)

define remove_prefix_2 as (
    [substring] among (
        'ma' 'na' 'ni' 'pa'
            (has_minimum_remainder delete set removed_prefix)
        'ka'
            (not 'ny' has_minimum_remainder delete set removed_prefix)
    )
)

define remove_prefix_once as (
    remove_prefix_9 or remove_prefix_8 or remove_prefix_7 or remove_prefix_6 or
    remove_prefix_5 or remove_prefix_4 or remove_prefix_3 or remove_prefix_2
)

define remove_infix as (
    $(limit >= 5)
    non-vowel
    [substring] among (
        'um'
            (test vowel has_minimum_infix_remainder delete set removed_infix)
        'in'
            (
                test vowel
                has_minimum_infix_remainder
                not (
                    atlimit 'd'
                    goto ('i' 'y' 'a' or 'i' 't' 'a')
                    atlimit
                )
                delete
                set removed_infix
            )
    )
)

backwardmode (

    define has_minimum_suffix_stem as (
        $(cursor >= 3)
        test (gopast vowel gopast vowel)
    )

    define remove_suffix as (
        (
            ['g']
            test ('n' 'o' ('y' or 'i' or 't'))
            has_minimum_suffix_stem
            delete
            set removed_suffix
        ) or (
            $(len >= 7)
            ['g' 'n']
            test vowel
            has_minimum_suffix_stem
            delete
            set removed_suffix
        ) or (
            [substring] among (
                'han'
                    (has_minimum_suffix_stem delete set removed_suffix)
                'hin'
                    (has_minimum_suffix_stem delete set removed_suffix)
                'in'
                    (
                        (removed_prefix or removed_infix or removed_duplication)
                        has_minimum_suffix_stem
                        delete
                        set removed_suffix
                    )
                'an'
                    (
                        not likely_foreign
                        has_minimum_suffix_stem
                        (
                            (removed_prefix or removed_infix or removed_duplication)
                            or
                            ($(cursor >= 5) test non-vowel)
                        )
                        $(cursor >= 3)
                        delete
                        set removed_suffix
                    )
            )
        )
    )

    define normalize_suffix as (
        (removed_prefix or removed_infix or removed_duplication or removed_suffix)
        do (
            ['u']
            $(cursor >= 3)
            <- 'o'
        )
        do (
            ['r']
            $(cursor >= 3)
            <- 'd'
        )
        do (
            ['h']
            $(cursor >= 3)
            test vowel
            delete
        )
    )
)

define normalize_initial as (
    (removed_prefix or removed_infix or removed_duplication or removed_suffix)
    $(limit >= 4)
    [hop 1] -> dup
    test dup
    delete
)

define stem as (
    setmark start
    unset removed_prefix
    unset removed_infix
    unset removed_duplication
    unset removed_suffix
    unset likely_foreign
    do scan_foreign
    tomark start
    special_cases or exception1 or (
        do remove_prefix_once
        tomark start
        do remove_prefix_once
        tomark start
        do remove_partial_duplication
        tomark start
        do remove_infix
        tomark start
        do remove_partial_duplication
        backwards (
            do remove_suffix
            do normalize_suffix
        )
        tomark start
        do normalize_initial
    )
)
